District of Columbia statutes.
21-102

Testamentary guardians of the person.

When one parent is dead, the other, whether of full age or not, may, by last will and testament, appoint a guardian of the person to have the care, custody, and tuition of his infant child, other than a married infant; and if the person so appointed refuses the trust, the Probate Court may appoint another person in his place.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 737, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 27, 23 DCR 2544
Abuse of adults, duty to report, see § 7-1903.
1981 Ed., § 21-102.
1973 Ed., § 21-102.